Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.110

Tracking felony cases.

(1) The department shall maintain records to track felony cases for convicted felons sentenced either to a term of confinement exceeding one year or ordered under the supervision of the department and felony cases under the jurisdiction of the department pursuant to interstate compact agreements.

(2) Tracking shall begin at the time the department receives a judgment and sentence form from a prosecuting attorney and shall include the collection and updating of felons' criminal records from the time of sentencing through discharge.

(3) The department of corrections shall collect information for tracking felons from its offices and from information provided by county clerks, the Washington state patrol *identification, child abuse, and criminal history section, the office of financial management, and any other public or private agency that provides services to help individuals complete their felony sentences.

[ 1999 c 143 s 52; 1993 c 31 s 1; 1987 c 462 s 2; 1984 c 17 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "identification, child abuse, and criminal history section" was renamed the "identification and criminal history section" by 2006 c 294 s 1.

Effective dates—1987 c 462: See note following RCW 13.04.116.